California, session 20252026, AB2571.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1368.5 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1368.5. (a)  A health care service plan that offers coverage for a service that is within the scope of practice of a duly licensed pharmacist shall pay or reimburse the cost of the service performed by a pharmacist at an in-network pharmacy, a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy if the health care service plan has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit, or a pharmacist enrolled as a provider with the health care service plan.(b)  Payment or reimbursement may be made pursuant to this section for a service performed by a duly licensed pharmacist only when all of the following conditions are met:(1)  The service performed is within the lawful scope of practice of the pharmacist.(2)  The coverage otherwise provides reimbursement for similar services performed by other licensed health care providers.(c)  This section does not require the plan to pay a claim to more than one provider for duplicate service or be interpreted to limit physician reimbursement.(d) For purposes of this section, “pharmacist” includes a pharmacist providing services at a federally qualified health center or a rural health clinic, as those terms are defined in Section 1396d(l) of Title 42 of the United States Code.(e) This section does not apply to a Medi-Cal managed care plan that contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.SEC. 2. Section 10125.1 of the Insurance Code is amended to read:10125.1. (a) An insurer issuing disability insurance that covers hospital, medical, or surgical expenses that offers coverage for a service that is within the scope of practice of a duly licensed pharmacist shall pay or reimburse the cost of the service performed by a pharmacist at an in-network pharmacy, a pharmacist at an out-of-network pharmacy if the insurer has an out-of-network pharmacy benefit, or a pharmacist enrolled as a provider with the insurer.(b) Payment or reimbursement may be made pursuant to this section for a service performed by a duly licensed pharmacist only when all of the following conditions are met:(1) The service performed is within the lawful scope of practice of the pharmacist.(2) The coverage otherwise provides reimbursement for similar services performed by other licensed health care providers.(c) This section does not require the insurer to pay a claim to more than one provider for duplicate service or be interpreted to limit physician reimbursement.(d) For purposes of this section, “pharmacist” includes a pharmacist providing services at a federally qualified health center or a rural health clinic, as those terms are defined in Section 1396d(l) of Title 42 of the United States Code.SEC. 3. Section 14132.968 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14132.968. (a) (1) Pharmacist services are a benefit under the Medi-Cal program, subject to approval by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.(2) The department shall establish a fee schedule for the list of pharmacist services.(3) The rate of reimbursement for pharmacist services shall be at 85 percent of the fee schedule for physician services under the Medi-Cal program, except for medication therapy management (MTM) pharmacist services as described in Section 14132.969.(4) The rate of reimbursement for advanced practice pharmacist services shall be the same as no less than 85 percent of the fee schedule for physician services under the Medi-Cal program, including MTM pharmacist services as described in Section 14132.969.(b) (1) The following services are covered pharmacist services that may be provided to a Medi-Cal beneficiary:(A) Furnishing travel medications, as authorized in clause (3) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 4052 of the Business and Professions Code.(B) Furnishing naloxone hydrochloride, as authorized in Section 4052.01 of the Business and Professions Code.(C) Furnishing self-administered hormonal contraception, as authorized in subdivision (a) of Section 4052.3 of the Business and Professions Code.(D) Initiating and administering immunizations, as authorized in Section 4052.8 of the Business and Professions Code.(E) Providing tobacco cessation counseling and furnishing nicotine replacement therapy, as authorized in Section 4052.9 of the Business and Professions Code.(F) Initiating and furnishing preexposure prophylaxis, as authorized in Section 4052.02 of the Business and Professions Code.(G) Initiating and furnishing postexposure prophylaxis, as authorized in Section 4052.03 of the Business and Professions Code.(H) Providing MTM pharmacist services in conjunction with the use of qualified specialty drugs, as described in Section 14132.969.(2) Covered pharmacist services shall be subject to department protocols and utilization controls.(c) A pharmacist shall be enrolled as an ordering, referring, and prescribing provider under the Medi-Cal program before rendering a pharmacist service that is submitted by a pharmacist or a Medi-Cal pharmacy provider for reimbursement pursuant to this section.(d) (1) The director shall seek any necessary federal approvals to implement this section. This section shall not be implemented until the necessary federal approvals are obtained and shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.(2) This section does not restrict or prohibit services currently provided by pharmacists as authorized by law, including this chapter and the Medicaid state plan.(e) The department shall seek federal approval of a state plan amendment to recognize pharmacists as health care providers at federally qualified health centers and rural health clinics for reimbursement purposes under the Medi-Cal program.(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, and any applicable federal waivers and state plan amendments, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. By July 1, 2021, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Commencing July 1, 2017, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, until regulations have been adopted.SEC. 4. Section 14132.969 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14132.969. (a) Subject to an annual appropriation for this express purpose, the department shall implement a medication therapy management (MTM) reimbursement methodology for covered pharmacist services related to the use of qualified specialty drugs. MTM reimbursement pursuant to this section is intended to ensure Medi-Cal payments are only made to eligible advanced practice pharmacists or pharmacies, including those operating at federally qualified health centers or rural health clinics, for MTM pharmacist services provided in conjunction with certain specialty drug therapy categories, as identified by the department pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).(b) In implementing this section, the department shall do all of the following:(1) Establish and maintain protocols and utilization controls for covered MTM pharmacist services.(2) Establish and maintain a list of covered specialty drug therapy categories for which MTM pharmacist services reimbursement is available.(3) Establish and maintain rates of reimbursement for covered MTM pharmacist services under contracts with participating pharmacies pursuant to subdivision (c).(4) Establish and maintain the eligibility criteria and conditions for receipt of MTM pharmacist services reimbursement pursuant to this section.(c) (1) MTM pharmacist services reimbursement pursuant to this section shall only be available to a Medi-Cal enrolled pharmacy or an eligible advanced practice pharmacist that enters into an MTM pharmacist services contract with the department.(2) For purposes of implementing this section, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.(d) (1) This section shall apply to dates of service on or after July 1, 2021, or to dates of service on or after the effective date reflected in any necessary federal approvals obtained by the department pursuant to paragraph (2), whichever is later.(2) The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to implement this section.(3) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.(e) This section does not restrict or prohibit services currently provided by pharmacists as authorized by law, including this chapter and the Medicaid state plan.(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletins or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.(g) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Medication therapy management” or “MTM” means a distinct service or group of services, as determined by the department, that are provided by pharmacists to improve health outcomes of beneficiaries who are at risk of treatment failure due to noncompliance, nonadherence, or other factors found to negatively affect drug therapy outcomes.(2) “Specialty drugs” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (13) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.45.SEC. 5. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.